Idaho, session 2025, H0167.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 7-701, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
7-701. USES FOR WHICH AUTHORIZED. Subject to the provisions of this
chapter, the right of eminent domain may be exercised in behalf of the fol-
lowing public uses:
1. Public buildings and grounds for the use of the state, and all other
public uses authorized by the legislature.
2. Public buildings and grounds for the use of any county, incorporated
city or school district; canals, aqueducts, flumes, ditches or pipes for
conducting water for use on state property or for the use of the inhabitants
of any county or incorporated city, or for draining state property for any
county or incorporated city, raising the banks of streams, removing obstruc-
tions therefrom and widening, deepening or straightening their channels,
roads, streets, alleys, and all other public uses for the benefit of the
state or of any county, incorporated city or the inhabitants thereof.
3. Wharves, docks, piers, chutes, booms, ferries, bridges, toll roads,
byroads, plank and turnpike roads, steam, electric and horse railroads,
reservoirs, canals, ditches, flumes, aqueducts and pipes, for public
transportation supplying mines and farming neighborhoods with water, and
draining and reclaiming lands, and for storing and floating logs and lumber
on streams not navigable.
4. Roads, tunnels, ditches, flumes, pipes and dumping places for work-
ing mines; also outlets, natural or otherwise, for the flow, deposit or con-
duct of tailings or refuse matter from mines; also, an occupancy in common
by the owners or possessors of different mines of any place for the flow, de-
posit or conduct of tailings or refuse matter from their several mines.
5. Byroads, leading from highways to residences and farms.
6. Telephones, telegraph and telephone lines.
7. Sewerage of any incorporated city.
8. Cemeteries for the burial of the dead, and enlarging and adding to
the same and the grounds thereof.
9. Pipe lines Pipelines for the transmission, delivery, furnishing or
distribution of natural or manufactured gas for light, heat or power, or for
the transportation of crude petroleum or petroleum products; also for tanks,
reservoirs, storage, terminal and pumping facilities, telephone, telegraph
and power lines necessarily incident to such pipe lines pipelines.


10. Snow fences or barriers for the protection of highways from drift-
ing snow.
11. Electric distribution and transmission lines for the delivery,
furnishing, distribution, and transmission of electric current for power,
lighting, heating or other purposes; and structures, facilities and equip-
ment for the production, generation, and manufacture of electric current
for power, lighting, heating or other purposes, provided that at least sev-
enty-five percent (75%) of the electricity generated therefrom remains for
sale within the state of Idaho at Idaho market rate prices in effect at the
time of the sale of electricity.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.